California, session 20252026, AB625.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7316 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7316. (a) The practice of barbering is all or any combination of the following practices:(1) Shaving or trimming the beard or cutting the hair.(2) Giving facial and scalp massages or treatments with oils, creams, lotions, or other preparations either by hand or mechanical appliances.(3) Singeing, shampooing, arranging, dressing, curling, waving, chemical waving, hair relaxing, or dyeing the hair or applying hair tonics.(4) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, or lotions to scalp, face, or neck. (5)Hairstyling of all textures of hair by standard methods that are current at the time of the hairstyling. (b) The practice of cosmetology is all or any combination of the following practices:(1) Arranging, dressing, curling, waving, machineless Machineless permanent waving, permanent waving, cleansing, cutting, shampooing, relaxing, singeing, bleaching, tinting, coloring, straightening, dyeing, applying hair tonics to, beautifying, or otherwise treating by any means the hair of any person.(2) Massaging, cleaning, or stimulating the scalp, face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body, by means of the hands, devices, apparatus or appliances, with or without the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.(3) Beautifying the face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body, by use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.(4) Removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by the use of depilatories or by the use of tweezers, chemicals, or preparations or by the use of devices or appliances of any kind or description, except by the use of light waves, commonly known as rays.(5) Cutting, trimming, polishing, tinting, coloring, cleansing, or manicuring the nails of any person.(6) Massaging, cleansing, treating, or beautifying the hands or feet of any person.(7) Tinting and perming of the eyelashes and brows, or applying eyelashes to any person.(c) The practice of skin care is all or any combination of the following practices:(1) Giving facials, massaging, stimulating, exfoliating, cleansing, or beautifying the face, scalp, neck, hands, arms, feet, legs, or upper part of the human body by the use of hands, esthetic devices, cosmetic products, antiseptics, lotions, tonics, or creams for the purpose of improving the appearance or well-being of the skin that do not result in the ablation or destruction of the live tissue.(2) Tinting and perming of the eyelashes and brows, or applying eyelashes to any person.(3) Removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by use of depilatories, tweezers, sugaring, nonprescription chemical, or waxing, or by the use of devices and appliances of any kind or description, except by the use of lasers or light waves, which are commonly known as rays.(d) The practice of nail care is all or a combination of trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing, manicuring, or pedicuring the nails of any person or massaging, cleansing, or beautifying from the elbow to the fingertips or the knee to the toes of any person.(e) The practice of barbering, the practice of cosmetology, barbering and the practice of hairstyling cosmetology do not include any of the following:(1) The mere sale, fitting, or styling of wigs or hairpieces.(2) Natural hair braiding. Natural hair braiding is a service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding by hand or mechanical device, provided that the service does not include haircutting or the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair.(3) Threading.(4) (A) The practices of arranging, beautifying, cleansing, curling, dressing, shampooing, or waving the hair of a person.(3)Threading. Threading is a technique that results(B) A person who engages in removing hair by twisting thread around unwanted hair and pulling it from the skin and the practices specified in subparagraph (A) at an establishment shall provide notice to consumers of the incidental trimming of eyebrow hair. person’s licensure status.(f) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), a person who engages in natural hairstyling, which hairstyling is defined as the provision of natural hair braiding services together with any of the services or procedures defined within the regulated practices of barbering or cosmetology, is subject to regulation pursuant to this chapter and shall obtain and maintain a barbering or cosmetology license as applicable to the services respectively offered or performed.(g) (1) Electrolysis is the practice of removing hair from, or destroying hair on, the human body by the use of an electric needle only.(2) “Electrolysis” as used in this chapter includes electrolysis or thermolysis.(h) The practice of hairstyling is one or both of the following: As used in this section:(1) Styling “Natural hair braiding” means a service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding by hand or mechanical device, provided that the service does not include haircutting or the application of all textures dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter the color of the hair by standard methods that are current at or to straighten, curl, or alter the time structure of the hairstyling. hair.(2) Arranging, blow drying, cleansing, curling, cutting, dressing, extending, shampooing, waving, or nonchemically straightening the hair “Natural hairstyling” means the provision of natural hair braiding services together with any of any person using both electrical and nonelectrical devices. the services or procedures defined within the regulated practices of barbering or cosmetology.(3) “Threading” means a technique that results in removing hair by twisting thread around unwanted hair and pulling it from the skin and the incidental trimming of eyebrow hair.SEC. 2. Section 7322 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.7322.The board shall admit to examination for a license as a hairstylist to practice hairstyling any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:(a)Is not less than 17 years of age.(b)Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.(c)Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.(d)Has done any of the following:(1)Completed a course in hairstyling from a school approved by the board.(2)Practiced hairstyling as defined in this chapter outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in hairstyling from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).SEC. 3. Section 7363 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.7363.(a)A course in hairstyling established by a school shall consist of not less than 600 hours of practical and technical instruction.(b)The curriculum for a hairstyling course shall include, at a minimum, technical and practical instruction in the following areas:(1)One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.(2)One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, which includes disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.(3)(A)Two hundred hours in hair styling services, which includes arranging, blow drying, cleansing, curling, dressing, hair analysis, shampooing, waving, and nonchemical straightening, and hair cutting including the use of shears, razors, electrical clippers and trimmers, and thinning shears, for wet and dry cutting.(B)Instruction in hairstyling services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.SEC. 4. Section 7389.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7389.5. A course of training in barbering, cosmetology, barbering or hairstyling cosmetology established by federal or state correctional institutions in California may qualify a person thereby trained to take the examination for licensure as a barber, cosmetologist, barber or hairstylist, provided cosmetologist if the course complies with all applicable provisions of this act chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.SEC. 5. Section 7423 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7423. The amounts of the fees required by this chapter relating to licenses for individual practitioners are as follows:(a) (1) Cosmetologist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(2) A cosmetologist initial license fee shall not be more than fifty dollars ($50).(b) (1) An esthetician application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(2) An esthetician initial license fee shall not be more than forty dollars ($40).(c) (1) A manicurist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(2) A manicurist initial license fee shall not be more than thirty-five dollars ($35).(d) (1) A barber application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(2) A barber initial license fee shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).(e) (1) An electrologist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(2) An electrologist initial license fee shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).(f) An apprentice application and license fee shall be not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).(g) The license renewal fee for individual practitioner licenses that are subject to renewal shall be not more than fifty dollars ($50).(h)A hairstylist application and examination fee shall be the actual cost to the board for developing, purchasing, grading, and administering the examination.(i)A hairstylist’s initial license fee shall be no more than fifty dollars ($50). (j)(h) Notwithstanding Section 163.5 the license renewal delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of renewal.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1.This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Business and Professions Code.